apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<pardef n="medij__n"   ><!--medij as in psychic -->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="medium__n"   ><!--medij as in medium not in the book at this point, added by me. The only difference is in animacy  -->
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sokol__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="greben__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>  
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="medij"><i>medij</i><par n="medij__n" /></e>
<e lm="medij"><p><l>medij</l><r>medij:1</r></p><par n="medium__n" /></e>
<e lm="sokol"><i>sokol</i><par n="sokol__n" /></e>
<e lm="golub"><i>golub</i><par n="sokol__n" /></e>
